Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2323
Enforcement of act; violations; penalties.

(1) In order to insure compliance with the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act, the department may apply for a temporary restraining order, a temporary or permanent injunction, or a mandatory injunction against any person violating or threatening to violate the act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act. The district court of the county where the violation is occurring or is about to occur has jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.

(2) The Attorney General or the county attorney of the county in which violations of the act, rules, or regulations are occurring or about to occur shall, when notified of such violation or threatened violation, cause appropriate proceedings under subsection (1) of this section to be instituted and pursued without delay.

(3) Any person who violates the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act or any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act is guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class II misdemeanor for each subsequent offense.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 22.